Washington statutes.
RCW 6.25.080

Issuance of writ—Attachment bond.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, before the writ of attachment shall issue, the plaintiff, or someone in the plaintiff's behalf, shall execute and file with the clerk a surety bond or undertaking in the sum in no case less than three thousand dollars, in the superior court, nor less than five hundred dollars in the district court, and double the amount for which plaintiff demands judgment, or such other amount as the court shall fix, conditional that the plaintiff will prosecute the action without delay and will pay all costs that may be adjudged to the defendant, and all damages that the defendant may sustain by reason of the writ of attachment or of additional writs issued as permitted under RCW 6.25.120, not exceeding the amount specified in such bond or undertaking, as the penalty thereof, should the same be wrongfully, oppressively or maliciously sued out.

(2) If it is desired to attach real estate only, and such fact is stated in the affidavit for attachment, and the ground of attachment is that the defendant is a foreign corporation or is not a resident of the state, or conceals himself or herself or has absconded or is absent from his or her usual place of abode so that the ordinary process of law cannot be served upon him or her, the writ of attachment shall issue without bond or undertaking by or on behalf of the plaintiff.

(3) If the plaintiff sues on an assigned claim and the plaintiff's immediate or any other assignor thereof retains or has any interest in the claim, then the plaintiff and every assignor who retains or has any interest therein shall be jointly and severally liable for all costs that may be adjudged to the defendant and for all damages that the defendant may sustain by reason of the attachment, should the same be wrongfully, oppressively or maliciously sued out.

[ 1988 c 231 s 16. Prior: 1987 c 442 s 808; 1987 c 202 s 128; 1957 c 51 s 1; 1903 c 41 s 1; 1886 p 40 s 6; RRS s 652; prior: Code 1881 ss 174-192; 1877 pp 35-40; 1873 pp 43-50; 1871 pp 9, 10; 1869 pp 41-47; 1863 pp 112-120; 1860 pp 30-36; 1854 pp 155-162. Formerly RCW 7.12.060.]

NOTES:

Severability—1988 c 231: See note following RCW 6.01.050.

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.

Corporate surety—Insurance: Chapter 48.28 RCW.

Court may fix amount of bond in civil actions: RCW 4.44.470.